src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/proper-even_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each proper:
# ok = checked against
# ? = not checked

# Even syllable propers belonging to BISSAU-plc, OY-plc, HAWAII-plc, SKOHTERMADII-plc, SIJTE-plc, NYSTØ-plc, MARJA-U-plc, MARJA-I-plc, BERN-ani/BERN-plc,
# DUBAI-sur, HEANDARAT-plc, VARGGAT-plc, ALEUHTAT-plc, ACCRA-plc, NIKOSIIJA-obj,
# NYSTØ, C-FI-NEN-sur, RONDANE-obj, SKANIK-plc, ALBMOTMUSEA-obj

Tests:

  Proper - Bissau: # BISSAU-plc
    Bissau+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom: Bissau
    Bissau+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Bissau
    Bissau+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Bissauii
    Bissau+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Loc: Bissaus
    Bissau+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill: bissaulažžii
    Bissau+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Pl+Acc: bissaulaččaid


  Proper - Algrøy: # OY-plc
    Algrøy+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom: Algrøy
    Algrøy+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Algrøya
    Algrøy+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Algrøyai
    Algrøy+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Loc: Algrøyas
    Algrøy+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill: algrøyalažžii
    Algrøy+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Pl+Acc: algrøyalaččaid

  Proper - Hawaii: # HAWAII-plc
    Hawaii+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom: Hawaii
    Hawaii+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Hawaii
    Hawaii+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Hawaiijii
    Hawaii+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Loc: Hawaiijis
    Hawaii+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill: hawaiilažžii
    Hawaii+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Pl+Acc: hawaiilaččaid

  Proper - Nordlánddaruovdemáđii: # SKOHTERMADII-plc
    Nordlánddaruovdemáđii+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom: [Nordlánddaruovdemáđii, Nordlánddaruovdemáđidja, Nordlánddaruovdemáđeadji]
    Nordlánddaruovdemáđii+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: [Nordlánddaruovdemáđii, Nordlánddaruovdemáđija, Nordlánddaruovdemáđeaji]
    Nordlánddaruovdemáđii+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: [Nordlánddaruovdemáđidjii, Nordlánddaruovdemáđeadjái]
    Nordlánddaruovdemáđii+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Loc: [Nordlánddaruovdemáđijas, Nordlánddaruovdemáđeajis]

  Proper - Gaarphkdaelie: # SIJTE-plc
    Gaarphkdaelie+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom: Gaarphkdaelie
    Gaarphkdaelie+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Gaarphkdaelie
    Gaarphkdaelie+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Gaarphkdaeliei
    Gaarphkdaelie+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Loc: Gaarphkdaelies
    Gaarphkdaelie+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill: gaarphkdaelielažžii
    Gaarphkdaelie+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Pl+Acc: gaarphkdaelielaččaid


  Proper - Bittersjø: # NYSTØ-plc
    Bittersjø+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom: Bittersjø
    Bittersjø+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Bittersjø
    Bittersjø+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Bittersjøi
    Bittersjø+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Loc: Bittersjøs
    Bittersjø+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill: bittersjølažžii
    Bittersjø+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Pl+Acc: bittersjølaččaid

  Proper - Klareatnu: # MARJA-U-plc
    Klareatnu+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom: Klareatnu
    Klareatnu+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: [Klareanu, Klareano]
    Klareatnu+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Klaretnui
    Klareatnu+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Loc: Klareanus
    Klareatnu+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill: klareatnulažžii
    Klareatnu+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Pl+Acc: klareatnulaččaid

  Proper - Klemmoaivi: # MARJA-I-plc
    Klemmoaivi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom: Klemmoaivi
    Klemmoaivi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: [Klemmoaivvi, Klemmoaivve]
    Klemmoaivi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Klemmoaivái
    Klemmoaivi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Loc: Klemmoaivvis
    Klemmoaivi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill: klemmoaivilažžii
    Klemmoaivi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Pl+Acc: klemmoaivilaččaid


  Proper - Gabná: # MARJA-plc
    Gabná+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom: Gabná
    Gabná+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Gapná

  Proper - Kerberos: # BERN-plc
    Kerberos+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom: Kerberos
    Kerberos+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: [Kerberosa, Kerberos]
    Kerberos+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Kerberosii
    Kerberos+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Loc: Kerberosis

  Proper - Stai: # DUBAI-sur
    Stai+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Nom: Stai
    Stai+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Gen: [Staja, Stai]
    Stai+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ill: Stajii
    Stai+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Loc: Stajas

  Proper - Sieinnus-Návggastat: # HEANDARAT-plc
    Sieinnus-Návggastat+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom: Sieinnus-Návggastat
    Sieinnus-Návggastat+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Sieinnus-Návggastaga
    Sieinnus-Návggastat+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Sieinnus-Návggastahkii
    Sieinnus-Návggastat+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Loc: Sieinnus-Návggastagas

  Proper - Šleađut: # VARGGAT-plc
    Šleađut+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Nom: Šleađut
    Šleađut+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Gen: Šleađuid
    Šleađut+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ill: Šleađuide
    Šleađut+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Loc: Šleađuin
    Šleađut+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill: šleađutlažžii
    Šleađut+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Pl+Acc: šleađutlaččaid

  Proper - Doaresdievát: # ALEUHTAT-plc
    Doaresdievát+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Nom: Doaresdievát
    Doaresdievát+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Gen: Doaresdieváid
    Doaresdievát+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ill: Doaresdieváide
    Doaresdievát+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Loc: Doaresdieváin
    Doaresdievát+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill: doaresdievátlažžii
    Doaresdievát+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Pl+Acc: doaresdievátlaččaid

  Proper - Romania: # ACCRA-plc
    Romania+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom: Romania
    Romania+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Romania
    Romania+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Romaniai
    Romania+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Loc: Romanias
    Romania+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill: romanialažžii
    Romania+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Pl+Acc: romanialaččaid

  Proper - Kaffegalleriija: # NIKOSIIJA-obj
    Kaffegalleriija+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Nom: Kaffegalleriija
    Kaffegalleriija+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Gen: Kaffegalleriija
    Kaffegalleriija+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ill: Kaffegalleriijai
    Kaffegalleriija+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Loc: Kaffegalleriijas

  Proper - Bergsjø: # NYSTØ
    Bergsjø+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom: Bergsjø
    Bergsjø+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Bergsjø
    Bergsjø+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Bergsjøi
    Bergsjø+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Loc: Bergsjøs

  Proper - Sottinen: # C-FI-NEN-sur
    Sottinen+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Nom: Sottinen
    Sottinen+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Gen: [Sottinena, Sottisa, Sottinen]
    Sottinen+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ill: [Sottinenii, Sottisii]
    Sottinen+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Loc: [Sottinenis, Sottisis]

  Proper - BackOffice: # RONDANE-obj
    BackOffice+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Nom: BackOffice
    BackOffice+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Gen: BackOffice
    BackOffice+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ill: BackOfficii
    BackOffice+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Loc: BackOffices
    
  Proper - Baikalágojávrrik: # SKANIK-plc
    Baikalágojávrrik+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Nom: Baikalágojávrrik
    Baikalágojávrrik+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Gen: Baikalágojávrriid
    Baikalágojávrrik+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ill: Baikalágojávrriide
    Baikalágojávrrik+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Loc: Baikalágojávrriin
    Baikalágojávrrik+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill: baikalágojávrriklažžii
    Baikalágojávrrik+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Pl+Acc: baikalágojávrriklaččaid

  Proper - Eksekutivkomitea: # ALBMOTMUSEA-org
    Eksekutivkomitea+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Nom: Eksekutivkomitea
    Eksekutivkomitea+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Gen: Eksekutivkomitea
    Eksekutivkomitea+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ill: Eksekutivkomiteii
    Eksekutivkomitea+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Loc: Eksekutivkomiteas
